Tennessee, session 114, SB1241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-102(b)(1), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(C) A person under eighteen (18) years of age witnesses the abuse of another
child in the person's immediate family or household or domestic abuse, as defined in §
36-3-601, of a member of the person's immediate family or household;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 37, Chapter 2, Part 4, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, if a child has been removed from the
custody of a parent or legal guardian due to a finding of abuse, as defined in § 37-1-102,
and placed in foster care with the department or in the care of an agency as provided in
§ 37-2-403, then reunification with the parent must not occur unless the parent has
complied with the parent's statement of responsibilities in the permanency plan and the
child has received mental health counseling.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1241
003089
- 1 -